California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(3) Singeing, shampooing, arranging, dressing, curling, waving, chemical waving, hair relaxing, or dyeing the hair or applying hair tonics.

(4) Applying cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, powders, oils, clays, or lotions to scalp, face, or neck.

(5) Hairstyling of all textures of hair by standard methods that are current at the time of the hairstyling.

(b) The practice of cosmetology is all or any combination of the following practices:

(1) Arranging, dressing, curling, waving, machineless permanent waving, permanent waving, cleansing, cutting, shampooing, relaxing, singeing, bleaching, tinting, coloring, straightening, dyeing, applying hair tonics to, beautifying, or otherwise treating by any means the hair of any person.

(2) Massaging, cleaning, or stimulating the scalp, face, neck, arms, or upper part of the human body, by means of the hands, devices, apparatus or appliances, with or without the use of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or creams.

(3) Beautifying the face, neck, arms, or upper part of the human body, by use of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or creams.

(4) Removing superfluous hair from the body of any person by the use of depilatories or by the use of tweezers, chemicals, or preparations or by the use of devices or appliances of any kind or description, except by the use of light waves, commonly known as rays.

(5) Cutting, trimming, polishing, tinting, coloring, cleansing, or manicuring the nails of any person.

(6) Massaging, cleansing, treating, or beautifying the hands or feet of any person.

(7) Tinting and perming of the eyelashes and brows, or applying eyelashes to any person.

(c) The practice of skin care is all or any combination of the following practices:

(1) Giving facials, massaging, stimulating, exfoliating, cleansing, or beautifying the face, scalp, neck, hands, arms, feet, legs, or upper part of the human body by the use of hands, esthetic devices, cosmetic products, antiseptics, lotions, tonics, or creams for the purpose of improving the appearance or well-being of the skin that do not result in the ablation or destruction of the live tissue.

(2) Tinting and perming of the eyelashes and brows, or applying eyelashes to any person.

(3) Removing superfluous hair from the body of any person by use of depilatories, tweezers, sugaring, nonprescription chemical, or waxing, or by the use of devices and appliances of any kind
 or description, except by the use of lasers or light waves, which are commonly known as rays.

(d) The practice of nail care is all or a combination of trimming, polishing, coloring, tinting, cleansing, manicuring, or pedicuring the nails of any person or massaging, cleansing, or beautifying from the elbow to the fingertips or the knee to the toes of any person.

(e) The practice of barbering, the practice of
 cosmetology, and the practice of hairstyling do not include any of the following:

(1) The mere sale, fitting, or styling of wigs or hairpieces.

(2) Natural hair braiding. Natural hair braiding is a service that results in tension on hair strands or roots by twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking, or braiding by hand or mechanical device, provided that the service does not include haircutting or the application of dyes, reactive chemicals, or other preparations to alter the color of the hair or to straighten, curl, or alter the structure of the hair.

(3) Threading. Threading is a technique that results in removing hair by twisting thread around unwanted hair and pulling it from the skin and the incidental trimming of eyebrow hair.

(f) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), a person who engages in natural hairstyling, which is defined as the provision of natural hair braiding services together with any of the services or procedures defined within the regulated practices of barbering or cosmetology, is subject to regulation pursuant to this chapter and shall obtain and maintain a barbering or cosmetology license as applicable to the services respectively offered or performed.

(g) (1) Electrolysis is the practice of removing hair from, or destroying hair on, the human body by the use of an electric needle only.

(2) “Electrolysis” as used in this chapter includes electrolysis or thermolysis.

(h) The practice of hairstyling is
 one or both of the following:

(1) Styling of all textures of hair by standard methods that are current at the time of the hairstyling.

(2) Arranging, blow drying, cleansing, curling, cutting, dressing, extending, shampooing, waving, or nonchemically straightening the hair of any person using both electrical and nonelectrical devices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 527, Sec. 1.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7317.

Except as provided in this article, it is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to engage in barbering, cosmetology, or electrolysis for compensation without a valid, unexpired license issued by the board, unless the person is participating in an externship program from an approved school, or in an establishment or mobile unit other than one licensed by the board, or conduct or operate an establishment, or any other place of business in which barbering, cosmetology, or electrolysis is practiced unless licensed under this chapter. Persons licensed under this chapter shall limit their practice and services rendered to the public to only those areas for which they are licensed. Any violation of this section is subject to an
 administrative fine and may be subject to a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 527, Sec. 2.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7318.

This chapter does not prohibit the administration of any practice subject to this chapter outside of a licensed establishment, when necessary due to the illness or other physical or mental incapacitation of the recipient of the service, and when performed by a licensee obtained for the purpose from a licensed establishment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7319.

The following persons are exempt from this chapter:

(a) All persons authorized by the laws of this state to practice medicine, surgery, dentistry, pharmacy, osteopathic medicine, chiropractic, naturopathy, podiatry, or nursing and acting within the scope of practice for which they are licensed.

(b) Commissioned officers of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, members of the United States Public Health Service, and attendants attached to those services when engaged in the actual performance of their official duties. 

(c) Persons employed to render barbering, cosmetology, or electrolysis services in the course of and incidental to the business of employers engaged in the theatrical, radio, television or motion picture production industry.

(d) Persons engaged in any practice within its scope when done outside of a licensed establishment, without compensation.

(e) Persons engaged in the administration of hair, skin, or nail products for the exclusive purpose of recommending, demonstrating, or selling those products.

(f) Persons who render barbering or cosmetology services in an institutional program during the course of and incidental to the incarceration or confinement of inmates, prisoners, or persons charged with a crime. However, all of the following conditions shall apply:

(1) Those persons shall complete a barbering training course, developed by the Department of Corrections and approved by the Department of Consumer Affairs, in the proper care of instruments and the prevention of infectious diseases.

(2) Those persons shall successfully pass an examination, developed and administered by the Department of Corrections, on the proper care of instruments and the prevention of infectious diseases.

(3) All barbering facilities located in correctional institutions shall be subject to all appropriate health and safety sanitation standards, as determined by the Department of Corrections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7319.5.

Students engaged in performing services on the public while enrolled in a school approved by the board shall not be required to be licensed under this chapter if they perform those services at the approved school in which they are enrolled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7319.7.

(a) A licensee or an applicant for licensure who completes the physical and sexual abuse awareness training covered by the health and safety course required by Section 7389,
 and his or her employer, shall not be required to act on information obtained during the course of employment concerning potential physical and sexual abuse unless otherwise required by law.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 312, Sec. 4.   (AB 326)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7320.

(a) This chapter confers no authority to practice medicine or surgery. The practice of medicine shall not be performed by, or offered by, a licensee under this chapter without being authorized and licensed to perform that act pursuant to a license obtained in accordance with some other provision of law.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to grant any privileges reserved for persons certified pursuant to Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 7.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7320.1.

When providing a manicure or pedicure, no metal instruments shall be used except those metal instruments necessary for the cutting, trimming, manicuring, or pedicuring of nails or cuticles or for the smoothing and massaging of the hands and feet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 415, Sec. 26.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7320.2.

Any licensee who uses an X-ray appliance, apparatus or machine in the treatment of any human being or for the purpose of or with the intent to remove superfluous hair from the face or body of any human being, or who applies to any human being a solution of phenol greater than 10 percent, or corrosive sublimate (mercury) or any of its preparations, derivatives, or compounds in a solution greater than one in five hundred, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7320.3.

Persons who are not licensed to perform all of the practices of a cosmetologist may not represent themselves as a cosmetologist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7320.4.

Persons who are not licensed as barbers in this state may not represent themselves as barbers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7320.5.

Any licensee who uses a laser in the treatment of any human being is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 253, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Qualifications for Examination [7321. - 7331.]

7321.

The board shall admit to examination for a license as a cosmetologist to practice cosmetology any person who has made application to the board in proper form, paid the fee required by this chapter, and is qualified as follows:

(a) Is not less than 17 years of age.

(b) Has completed the 10th grade in the public schools of this state or its equivalent.

(c) Is not subject to denial pursuant to Section 480.

(d) Has done any of the following:

(1) Completed a course in cosmetology from a school approved by the board.

(2) Practiced cosmetology as defined in this chapter outside of this state for a period of time equivalent to the study and training of a qualified person who has completed a course in cosmetology from a school the curriculum of which complied with requirements adopted by the board. Each three months of practice shall be deemed the equivalent of 100 hours of training for qualification under paragraph (1) of this subdivision.

(3) Holds a license as a barber in this state and has completed a cosmetology crossover course in a school approved by the board.

(4) Completed a barbering course in a school approved by the board and has completed a cosmetology crossover course in a school approved by the board.

(5) Completed the apprenticeship program in cosmetology specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 7332).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7321.5.

The board shall admit to examination for a license as a barber to practice barbering, any person who has made application to the board in proper form, paid the fee required by this chapter, and is qualified as follows:

(a) Is not less than 17 years of age.

(b) Has completed the 10th grade in the public schools of this state or its equivalent.

(c) Is not subject to denial pursuant to Section 480.

(d) Has done any of the following:

(1) Completed a course in barbering from a school approved by the board.

(2) Completed an apprenticeship program in barbering approved by the board as conducted under the provisions of the Shelley-Maloney Apprentice Labor Standards Act of 1939, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code.

(3) Practiced barbering as defined in this chapter outside of this state for a period of time equivalent to the study and training of a qualified person who has completed a course in barbering from a school the curriculum of which complied with requirements adopted by the board. Each three months of practice shall be deemed the equivalent of 100 hours of training for qualification under paragraph (1).

(4) Holds a license as a cosmetologist in this state and has completed a barber crossover course in a school approved by the board.

(5) Completed a cosmetology course in a school approved by the board and has completed a barber crossover course in a school approved by the board.

(6) Completed comparable military training as documented by submission of Verification of Military Experience and Training (V-MET) records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7322.

The board shall admit to examination for a license as a hairstylist to practice hairstyling any person who has made application to the board in proper form, paid the fee required by this chapter, and is qualified as follows:

(a) Is not less than 17 years of age.

(b) Has completed the 10th grade in the public schools of this state or its equivalent.

(c) Is not subject to denial pursuant to Section 480.

(d) Has done any of the following:

(1) Completed a course in hairstyling from a school approved by the board.

(2) Practiced hairstyling as defined in this chapter outside of this state for a period of time equivalent to the study and training of a qualified person who has completed a course in hairstyling from a school the curriculum of which complied with requirements adopted by the board. Each three months of practice shall be deemed the equivalent of 100 hours of training for qualification under paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 8.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7324.

The board shall admit to examination for a license as an esthetician to practice skin care, any person who has made application to the board in proper form, paid the fee required by this chapter, and is qualified as follows:

(a) Is not less than 17 years of age.

(b) Has completed the 10th grade in the public schools of this state or its equivalent.

(c) Is not subject to denial pursuant to Section 480.

(d) Has done any of the following:

(1) Completed a course in skin care from a school approved by the board.

(2) Practiced skin care, as defined in this chapter, outside of this state for a period of time equivalent to the study and training of a qualified person who has completed a course in skin care from a school the curriculum of which complied with requirements adopted by the board. Each three months of practice shall be deemed the equivalent of 100 hours of training for qualification under paragraph (1).

(3) Completed the apprenticeship program in skin care specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 7332).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7326.

The board shall admit to examination for a license as a manicurist to practice nail care, any person who has made application to the board in proper form, paid the fee required by this chapter, and is qualified as follows:

(a) Is not less than 17 years of age.

(b) Has completed the 10th grade in the public schools of this state or its equivalent.

(c) Is not subject to denial pursuant to Section 480.

(d) Has done any of the following:

(1) Completed a course in nail care from a school approved by the board.

(2) Practiced nail care, as defined in this chapter, outside of this state for a period of time equivalent to the study and training of a qualified person who has completed a course in nail care from a school the curriculum of which complied with requirements adopted by the board. Each three months of practice shall be deemed the equivalent of 100 hours of training for qualification under paragraph (1).

(3) Completed the apprenticeship program in nail care specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 7332).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7330.

The board shall admit to examination for a license as an electrologist to practice electrolysis, any person who has made application to the board in proper form, paid the fee required by this chapter, and is qualified as follows:

(a) Is not less than 17 years of age.

(b) Has completed the 12th grade or an accredited senior high school course of study in public schools of this state or its equivalent.

(c) Is not subject to denial pursuant to Section 480.

(d) Has done any of the following:

(1) Completed a course of training in electrolysis from a school approved by the board.

(2) Practiced electrolysis, as defined in this chapter, for a period of 18 months outside of this state within the time equivalent to the study and training of a qualified person who has completed a course in electrolysis from a school the curriculum of which complied with requirements adopted by the board. Each three months of practice shall be deemed the equivalent of 100 hours of training for qualification under paragraph (1).

(3) Completed the apprenticeship program in electrology specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 7332).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7331.

The board shall grant a license to practice to an applicant if the applicant submits all of the following to the board:

(a) A completed application form and all fees required by the board.

(b) Proof of a current license issued by another state to practice that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) It is not revoked, suspended, or otherwise restricted.

(2) It is in good standing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 9.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Apprenticeship [7332. - 7336.]

7332.

(a) An apprentice is any person who is licensed by the board to engage in learning or acquiring a knowledge of barbering, cosmetology, skin care, nail care, or electrology, in a licensed establishment under the supervision of a licensee approved by the board.

(b) For purposes of this section, “under the supervision of a licensee” means that the apprentice shall be supervised at all times by a licensee approved by the board while performing services in a licensed establishment. At no time shall an apprentice be the only individual working in the establishment. An apprentice that is not being supervised by a licensee, that has been approved by the
 board to supervise an apprentice, shall be deemed to be practicing unlicensed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 19.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7333.

The apprentice training program shall be conducted in compliance with the Shelley-Maloney Apprentice Labor Standards Act of 1939, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code, according to apprenticeship standards approved by the administrator of apprenticeship. A copy of the act shall be maintained on file with the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7334.

(a) The board may license as an apprentice in barbering, cosmetology, skin care, or nail care any person who has made application to the board upon the proper form, has paid the fee required by this chapter, and who is qualified as follows:

(1) Is over 16 years of age.

(2) Has completed the 10th grade in the public schools of this state or its equivalent.

(3) Is not subject to denial pursuant to Section 480.

(4) Has submitted evidence acceptable to the board that any training the apprentice is required by law to obtain shall be conducted in a licensed establishment and
 under the supervision of a licensee approved by the board.

(b) The board may license as an apprentice in electrolysis any person who has made application to the board upon the proper form, has paid the fee required by this chapter, and who is qualified as follows:

(1) Is not less than 17 years of age.

(2) Has completed the 12th grade or an accredited senior high school course of study in schools of this state or its equivalent.

(3) Is not subject to denial pursuant to Section 480.

(4) Has submitted evidence acceptable to the board that any training the apprentice is required by law to obtain shall be conducted in a licensed establishment and under the supervision of a licensee approved by
 the board.

(c) All persons making application as an apprentice in barbering shall also complete preapprentice training that is administered by the
 board for the length of time established by the board in a facility approved by the board prior to serving the general public.

(d) All persons making application as an apprentice in cosmetology, skin care, nail care, or electrology shall also complete minimum preapprentice training administered by the board for the length of time established by the board in a facility approved by the board prior to serving the general public.

(e) Apprentices may only perform services on the general public for which they have received technical training.

(f) Apprentices shall be required to obtain at least the minimum hours of technical instruction and minimum number of practical
 operations for each subject as specified in board regulations for courses taught in schools approved by the board, in accordance with Sections 3074 and 3078 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 527, Sec. 3.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7335.

(a) The license of an apprentice shall expire two years from the date the license was issued, or on the date the apprentice is issued a license following the license examination, or if the apprentice fails the license examination twice, on the date the results of the second examination are issued, whichever occurs first.

(b) No person holding a license as an apprentice shall work more than three months after completing the required training without applying for and taking the examination for licensure.

(c) The board may extend the two-year or three-month period described in subdivisions (a) and (b) upon a showing of good cause which shall include, but not be limited to, delays in applying for and taking the examination caused by the illness of, or accident to, the apprentice, or service in the armed forces of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7336.

An apprentice may do any or all of the acts for which he or she is licensed only in the licensed establishment and under the supervision and employment of a licensee approved by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Examinations [7337. - 7345.]

7337.

(a) Every application for admission to examination and licensure shall be in writing, on forms prepared and furnished by the board.

(b) Each application shall be accompanied by the required fee, and shall contain proof of the qualifications of the applicant for examination and licensure. It shall be verified by the oath of the applicant and shall include a signed acknowledgment that the applicant understands his or her rights as a licensee as outlined in informational materials on basic labor laws, as specified in Section 7314.3, that the applicant is provided by the board with the application. Every applicant shall, as a condition of admittance
 to the examination facility, present satisfactory proof of identification. Satisfactory proof of identification shall be in the form of a valid, unexpired driver’s license or identification card, containing the photograph of the person to whom it was issued, issued by any state, federal, or other government entity.

(c) Every electronic application to renew a license shall include a signed acknowledgment that the renewal applicant understands his or her rights as a licensee as outlined in informational materials on basic labor laws, as specified in Section 7314.3, that the renewal applicant is provided by the board with the renewal application.

(d) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1,
 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 409, Sec. 4.   (AB 2025)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Amended version operative July 1, 2017, pursuant to earlier operation of new subdivision (d).)
-------------------------------------------

7338.

(a) The examination of applicants for a license shall consist of a written examination that evaluates competency in protecting the health and safety of consumers of the services provided by licensees.

(b) The examination shall include written tests to determine the applicant’s skill in, and knowledge of, the practice of the occupation for which a license is sought and shall include written tests in antisepsis, disinfection, and the use of mechanical apparatus and electricity as applicable to the practice for which the applicant has applied for licensure.

(c) The written tests, as specified in subdivision (b), shall determine the applicant’s skill in, and knowledge of, providing services to individuals
 with varying hair types and textures, as applicable to the practice for which the applicant has applied for licensure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.   (AB 2166)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7340.

All examinations shall be prepared by or under the direction of the board. The board shall establish standards and procedures governing administration and grading and shall exercise supervision as may be necessary to assure compliance therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7341.

The board shall deliver to every person failing any examination provided for in this chapter the total grade received on the examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 422, Sec. 4.   (SB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7342.

Licenses in the practice of the occupation for which the license was sought shall be issued by the board to any applicant who satisfactorily passes an examination, who possesses the other qualifications required by law and who has remitted the license fee required by this chapter. The license shall entitle the holder to engage in the practice of that occupation in a licensed establishment. The license shall be issued by the board on the same day that the applicant satisfactorily passes the examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7344.

The board may contract or otherwise arrange for reasonably required physical accommodations and facilities to conduct examinations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 788, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7345.

If an applicant fails to complete his or her application within one year after it has been filed, or fails to take the examination within one year after becoming eligible therefor, the application shall be considered abandoned and the fee forfeited. An application submitted after the abandonment of a former application shall be treated as a new application and shall be required to meet all of the requirements for an initial license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Establishments [7346. - 7353.4.]

7346.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “establishment” means any premises, building or part of a building where any activity licensed under this chapter is practiced.

(b) “Establishment” also includes any premises, building, or part of a building in which natural hair styling is practiced for compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 37, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7347.

(a) Any person, firm, or corporation desiring to operate an establishment shall make an application to the board for a license accompanied by the fee prescribed by this chapter. The application shall be required whether the person, firm, or corporation is operating a new establishment or obtaining ownership of an existing establishment. The application shall include a signed acknowledgment that the applicant understands that establishments are responsible for compliance with any applicable labor laws of the state and that the applicant understands the informational materials on basic labor laws, as specified in Section 7314.3, the applicant is provided by the board with the application. Every electronic application to renew a license shall include a signed acknowledgment that the renewal applicant understands that establishments
 are responsible for compliance with any applicable labor laws of the state and that the applicant understands the informational materials on basic labor laws, as specified in Section 7314.3, that the renewal applicant is provided by the board with the renewal application. If the applicant is obtaining ownership of an existing establishment, the board may establish the fee in an amount less than the fee prescribed by this chapter. The applicant, if an individual, or each officer, director, and partner, if the applicant is other than an individual, shall not have committed acts or crimes which are grounds for denial of licensure in effect at the time the new application is submitted pursuant to Section 480. A license issued pursuant to this section shall authorize the operation of the establishment only at the location for which the license is issued. Operation of the establishment at any other location shall be unlawful unless a license for the new location has been obtained upon compliance with this section,
 applicable to the issuance of a license in the first instance.

(b) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 13.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7348.

An establishment shall at all times be in the charge of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter except an apprentice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 878, Sec. 48.3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7349.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to hire, employ, or allow to be employed, or permit to work, in or about an establishment, any person who performs or practices any occupation regulated under this chapter and is not duly licensed by the board, except that a licensed establishment may utilize a student extern, as described in Section 7395.1 or 7395.2.

Any person violating this section is subject to citation and fine pursuant to Section 7406 and is also guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 387, Sec. 1.   (AB 2134)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7349.1.

It is an unfair business practice for any person, firm, or corporation who engages in a practice regulated under this chapter to use the traditional symbol known as the barber pole, which comprises a striped vertical cylinder with a ball on top, with the intent to mislead the public in any manner that would make the public believe that barbering was being practiced in, or that a licensed barber is employed in, an establishment that does not employ licensed barbers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7350.

No person having charge of an establishment, whether as an owner or an employee, shall permit any room or part thereof in which any occupation regulated under this chapter is conducted or practiced to be used for residential purposes or for any other purpose that would tend to make the room unsanitary, unhealthy, or unsafe, or endanger the health and safety of the consuming public.

An establishment shall have a direct entrance separate and distinct from any entrance in connection with private quarters.

A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7351.

Every establishment shall provide at least one public toilet room located on or near the premises for its patrons. Any toilet room installed on or after July 1, 1992, shall be not less than 18 square feet in area. The entrance to the room shall be effectively screened so that no toilet compartment is visible from any workroom. The room shall be kept in a clean condition and in good repair, well lighted and ventilated to the outside air, and effectively screened against insects and free from rodents. The floor shall be of concrete, tile laid in cement, vitrified brick, or other nonabsorbent material. All sewer drains shall be connected to an approved disposal system, and shall be properly trapped. No restroom shall be used for storage.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1672, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1992, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 1672.)
-------------------------------------------

7352.

Every establishment shall provide adequate and convenient handwashing facilities, including running water, soap, and towels or air hand dryers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 415, Sec. 27.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7353.4.

(a) On and after July 1, 2017, an establishment licensed by the board shall, upon availability of the posting notice developed by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 98.10 of the Labor Code, post that notice in a manner that complies with the requirements of Section 98.10 of the Labor Code in a conspicuous location in clear view of employees and where similar notices are customarily posted. The notice shall be posted in English, Spanish, Vietnamese, and Korean.

(b) The board shall inspect for compliance with this posting requirement when it conducts an inspection pursuant to Section
 7313.

(c) A violation of this section shall be punished by an administrative fine established pursuant to Section 7407 and shall not be punished as a misdemeanor under Section 7404.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 527, Sec. 4.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Mobile Units [7354. - 7361.]

7354.

For purposes of this article, “mobile unit” means any self-contained, self-supporting, enclosed mobile unit which is licensed as a mobile unit for the practice of any occupation licensed by the board and which complies with this article and all health and safety regulations established by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 15.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7355.

(a) Any person, firm, or corporation desiring to operate a mobile unit shall make an application to the board for a license containing the information and data set forth in subdivision (b). The applicant, if an individual, or each officer, director, and partner, if the applicant is other than an individual, shall not have committed acts or crimes which are grounds for denial of licensure pursuant to Section 480.

(b) Each application shall include the following:

(1) A detailed floor plan showing the layout and dimensions of the mobile unit and all necessary systems and equipment contained therein.

(2) Proof of purchase or lease of the mobile unit.

(3) The required fee.

(4) Proof of a valid California driver’s license issued to an officer or employee responsible for driving the mobile unit.

(5) A permanent base address from which the mobile unit shall operate.

(c) After initial approval of the floor plan and application has been granted, the applicant shall schedule an appointment to show the mobile unit to the board, or representative of the board, for final approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 16.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7356.

An application to transfer ownership or control of an existing licensed mobile unit shall be filed by the purchaser or lessor with the board within 10 days after purchase. Each application shall include the following:

(a) A detailed floor plan showing the layout and dimensions of the mobile unit and all necessary systems and equipment contained therein.

(b) Bills of sale or lease documents proving purchase or lease of existing equipment and the mobile unit.

(c) The existing mobile unit license.

(d) The required fee.

(e) Proof of a valid California driver’s license issued to an officer or employee responsible for driving the mobile unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 648, Sec. 17.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7357.

(a) Mobile units shall comply with regulations adopted by the board that assure that the unit shall be kept clean, in good repair, and in compliance with this article.
